Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 11 IDAHO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE
Any person subject to this code who, in the presence of a court-martial, a board of officers, a military commission, a court of inquiry, a preliminary hearing, or an officer taking a deposition of or for the state military forces or for the United States, wrongfully refuses to qualify as a witness or to answer a question after having been directed to do so by the person presiding shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 131E. PREVENTION OF AUTHORIZED SEIZURE OF PROPERTY

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that one (1) or more persons authorized to make searches and seizures are seizing, are about to seize, or are endeavoring to seize property, destroys, removes, or otherwise disposes of the property with intent to prevent the seizure thereof shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 131F. NONCOMPLIANCE WITH PROCEDURAL RULES

Any person subject to this code who:

Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this chapter; or
(2) Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this chapter regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 131G. WRONGFUL INTERFERENCE WITH ADVERSE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING

Any person subject to this code who, having reason to believe that an adverse administrative proceeding is pending against any person subject to this code, wrongfully acts with the intent:

To influence, impede, or obstruct the conduct of the proceeding; or

Otherwise to obstruct the due administration of justice;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 132. RETALIATION

Any person subject to this code who, with the intent to retaliate against any person for reporting or planning to report a criminal offense, or making or planning to make a protected communication, or with the intent to discourage any person from reporting a criminal offense or making or planning to make a protected communication:

Wrongfully takes or threatens to take an adverse personnel action against any person; or

Wrongfully withholds or threatens to withhold a favorable personnel action with respect to any person;

Definitions. In this article:

“Protected communication” means the following:

A lawful communication to a member of congress or an inspector general; or

A communication to a covered individual or organization in which a member of the armed forces complains of, or discloses information that the member reasonably believes constitutes evidence of, any of the following:

A violation of law or regulation, including a law or regulation prohibiting sexual harassment or unlawful discrimination; or

Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of authority, or a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.

“Inspector general” has the meaning given that term in 10 U.S.C. 1034.

“Covered individual or organization” means any recipient of a communication specified in clauses (i) through (vi) of 10 U.S.C. 1034(b)(1)(B).

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 133. CONDUCT UNBECOMING AN OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN

Any commissioned officer, cadet, candidate, or midshipman who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 134. GENERAL ARTICLE

ARTICLE 135. COURTS OF INQUIRY

Courts of inquiry to investigate any matter of concern to the state military forces may be convened by any person authorized to convene a general court-martial, whether or not the persons involved have requested such an inquiry.

A court of inquiry consists of three (3) or more commissioned officers. For each court of inquiry, the convening authority shall also appoint counsel for the court.

Any person subject to this code whose conduct is subject to inquiry shall be designated as a party. Any person subject to this code who has a direct interest in the subject of inquiry has the right to be designated as a party upon request to the court. Any person designated as a party shall be given due notice and has the right to be present, to be represented by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses, and to introduce evidence.

Members of a court of inquiry may be challenged by a party, but only for cause stated to the court.

The members, counsel, the reporter, and interpreters of courts of inquiry shall take an oath to faithfully perform their duties.

Witnesses may be summoned to appear and testify and be examined before courts of inquiry, as provided for courts-martial.

Courts of inquiry shall make findings of fact but may not express opinions or make recommendations unless required to do so by the convening authority.

Each court of inquiry shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and counsel for the court and forwarded to the convening authority. If the record cannot be authenticated by the president, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the president. If the record cannot be authenticated by the counsel for the court, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the counsel.

ARTICLE 136. AUTHORITY TO ADMINISTER OATHS AND TO ACT AS NOTARY

The following persons may administer oaths for the purposes of military administration, including military justice:

All judge advocates.

All summary courts-martial.

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants, and personnel adjutants.

All commanding officers of the naval militia.

All other persons designated by regulations of the armed forces of the United States or by statute.

All other persons designated by regulations of the armed forces of the United States or by statute.

The following persons may administer oaths necessary in the performance of their duties:
(1) The president, military judge, and trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial.

The signature without seal of any such person, together with the title of his office, is prima facie evidence of the person’s authority.

(2) The president and the counsel for the court of any court of inquiry.

(3) All officers designated to take a deposition.

(4) All persons detailed to conduct an investigation.

(5) All recruiting officers.

ARTICLE 137. ARTICLES TO BE EXPLAINED

The articles of this code specified in subsection (c) of this article shall be carefully explained to each enlisted member at the time of, or within thirty (30) days after, the member’s initial entrance into a duty status with the state military forces.

Such articles shall be explained again:

After the member has completed basic or recruit training; and

At the time when the member reenlists.

This subsection applies with respect to articles 2, 3, 7 through 15, 25, 27, 31, 37, 38, 55, 77 through 134, and 137 through 139 of this code.

The text of the code and of the regulations prescribed under such code shall be made available to a member of the state military forces, upon request by the member, for the member’s personal examination.

ARTICLE 138. COMPLAINTS OF WRONGS

Any member of the state military forces who believes himself wronged by a commanding officer, and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress may complain to any superior commissioned officer, who shall forward the complaint to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the officer against whom it is made. The officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction shall examine into the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of, and shall, as soon as possible, send to the adjutant general a true statement of that complaint, with the proceedings had thereon.

ARTICLE 139. REDRESS OF INJURIES TO PROPERTY

Whenever complaint is made to any commanding officer that willful damage has been done to the property of any person or that the person’s property has been wrongfully taken by members of the state military forces, that officer may, under such regulations prescribed, convene a board to investigate the complaint. The board shall consist of from one (1) to three (3) commissioned officers and, for the purpose of that investigation, it has power to summon witnesses and examine them upon oath, to receive depositions or other documentary evidence, and to assess the damages sustained against the responsible parties. The assessment of damages made by the board is subject to the approval of the commanding officer, and in the amount approved by that officer shall be charged against the pay of the offenders. The order of the commanding officer directing charges herein authorized is conclusive on any disbursing officer for payment to the injured parties of the damages so assessed and approved.
(b) If the offenders cannot be ascertained, but the organization or detachment to which they belong is known, charges totaling the amount of damages assessed and approved may be made in such proportion as may be considered just upon the individual members thereof who are shown to have been present at the scene at the time the damages complained of were inflicted, as determined by the approved findings of the board.

ARTICLE 140. DELEGATION BY THE GOVERNOR

The governor may delegate any authority vested in the governor under this code and provide for the sub-delegation of any such authority, except the power given the governor by article 22 of this code.

ARTICLE 141. PAYMENT OF FEES, COSTS AND EXPENSES

The fees and authorized travel expenses of all witnesses, experts, victims, court reporters, and interpreters, fees for the service of process, the costs of collection, apprehension, detention and confinement, and all other necessary expenses of prosecution and the administration of military justice, to include courts-martial and nonjudicial punishment, not otherwise payable by any other source, shall be paid out of the military division support fund as established in section 46-806, Idaho Code.

ARTICLE 142. PAYMENT OF FINES AND DISPOSITION THEREOF

Fines imposed by a military court or through imposition of nonjudicial punishment may be paid to the state and delivered to the court or imposing officer or to a person executing their process. Fines may be collected in the following manner:

By cash or money order;

By retention of any pay or allowances due or to become due the person fined from any state or the United States;

By garnishment or levy, together with costs, on the wages, goods, and chattels of a person delinquent in paying a fine, as provided by law.

Any sum so received or retained shall be deposited in the military division support fund as established in section 46-806, Idaho Code, or to whomever the court so directs.

ARTICLE 143. UNIFORMITY OF INTERPRETATION

This code shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make it uniform, so far as practical, with the uniform code of military justice, 10 U.S.C. chapter 47.

ARTICLE 144. IMMUNITY FOR ACTION OF MILITARY COURTS

All persons acting under the provisions of this code, whether as a member of the military or as a civilian, shall be immune from any personal liability for any of the acts or omissions which they did or failed to do as part of their duties under this code.

ARTICLE 145. SEVERABILITY

The provisions of this code are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this code or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this code.

ARTICLE 146. SHORT TITLE

This act may be cited as the “Idaho Code of Military Justice” (ICMJ).

ARTICLE 147. TIME OF TAKING EFFECT

This act takes effect July 1, 2019.